Washington statutes.
RCW 36.16.136

Liability insurance for officers and employees.

The board of county commissioners of each county may purchase liability insurance with such limits as they may deem reasonable for the purpose of protecting their officials and employees against liability for personal or bodily injuries and property damage arising from their acts or omissions while performing or in good faith purporting to perform their official duties.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 59 s 1.]